Missouri, session 2026, HB3522.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the state of Missouri, as follows:
Section A. Section 302.173, RSMo, is repealed and one new section enacted in lieu
thereof, to be known as section 302.173, to read as follows:
302.173. 1. Any applicant for a license, who does not possess a valid license issued
pursuant to the laws of this state, another state, or a country which has a reciprocal agreement
with the state of Missouri regarding the exchange of licenses pursuant to section 302.172
shall be examined as herein provided. Any person who has failed to renew such person's
license on or before the date of its expiration or within six months thereafter must take the
complete examination. Any active member of the Armed Forces, their adult dependents or
any active member of the Peace Corps may apply for a renewal license without examination
of any kind, unless otherwise required by sections 302.700 to 302.780, provided the renewal
application shows that the previous license had not been suspended or revoked. Any person
honorably discharged from the Armed Forces of the United States who held a valid license
prior to being inducted may apply for a renewal license within sixty days after such person's
honorable discharge without submitting to any examination of such person's ability to safely
operate a motor vehicle over the highways of this state unless otherwise required by sections
302.700 to 302.780, other than the vision test provided in section 302.175, unless the facts set
out in the renewal application or record of convictions on the expiring license, or the records
of the director show that there is good cause to authorize the director to require the applicant
to submit to the complete examination. No applicant for a renewal license shall be required to
EXPLANATION — Matter enclosed in bold-faced brackets [thus] in the above bill is not enacted and is
intended to be omitted from the law. Matter in bold-face type in the above bill is proposed language.

HB 3522 2
submit to any examination of his or her ability to safely operate a motor vehicle over the
highways of this state unless otherwise required by sections 302.700 to 302.780 or regulations
promulgated thereunder, other than a test of the applicant's ability to understand highway
signs regulating, warning or directing traffic and the vision test provided in section 302.175,
unless the facts set out in the renewal application or record of convictions on the expiring
license, or the records of the director show that there is good cause to authorize the director to
require the applicant to submit to the complete examination. The examination shall be made
available in each county. Reasonable notice of the time and place of the examination shall be
given the applicant by the person or officer designated to conduct it. The complete
examination shall include a test of the applicant's natural or corrected vision as prescribed in
section 302.175, the applicant's ability to understand highway signs regulating, warning or
directing traffic, the applicant's practical knowledge of the traffic laws of this state, and an
actual demonstration of ability to exercise due care in the operation of a motor vehicle of the
classification for which the license is sought. The written portion of the examination shall
only be administered in the English language and no translators shall be allowed for
applicants taking the written portion of the examination. When an applicant for a license
has a license from a state which has requirements for issuance of a license comparable to the
Missouri requirements or a license from a country which has a reciprocal agreement with the
state of Missouri regarding the exchange of licenses pursuant to section 302.172 and such
license has not expired more than six months prior to the date of application for the Missouri
license, the director may waive the test of the applicant's practical knowledge of the traffic
laws of this state, and the requirement of actual demonstration of ability to exercise due care
in the operation of a motor vehicle. If the director has reasonable grounds to believe that an
applicant is suffering from some known physical or mental ailment which ordinarily would
interfere with the applicant's fitness to operate a motor vehicle safely upon the highways, the
director may require that the examination include a physical or mental examination by a
licensed physician of the applicant's choice, at the applicant's expense, to determine the fact.
The director shall prescribe regulations to ensure uniformity in the examinations and in the
grading thereof and shall prescribe and furnish all forms to the members of the highway patrol
and to other persons authorized to conduct examinations as may be necessary to enable the
officer or person to properly conduct the examination. The records of the examination shall
be forwarded to the director who shall not issue any license hereunder if in the director's
opinion the applicant is not qualified to operate a motor vehicle safely upon the highways of
this state.
2. Beginning July 1, 2005, when the examiner has reasonable grounds to believe that
an individual has committed fraud or deception during the examination process, the license
examiner shall immediately forward to the director all information relevant to any fraud or

HB 3522 3
deception, including, but not limited to, a statement of the examiner's grounds for belief that
the person committed or attempted to commit fraud or deception in the written, skills, or
vision examination.
3. The director of revenue shall delegate the power to conduct the examinations
required for a license or permit to any member of the highway patrol or any person employed
by the highway patrol. The powers delegated to any examiner may be revoked at any time by
the director of revenue upon notice.
4. Notwithstanding the requirements of subsections 1 and 3 of this section, the
successful completion of a motorcycle rider training course approved pursuant to sections
302.133 to 302.137 shall constitute an actual demonstration of the person's ability to exercise
due care in the operation of a motorcycle or motortricycle, and no further practical knowledge
or driving test shall be required to obtain a motorcycle or motortricycle license or
endorsement. The motorcycle rider training course completion shall be accepted for purposes
of motorcycle license or endorsement issuance for one year from the date of course
completion.
5. Notwithstanding the requirements of subsections 1 and 3 of this section, the
successful completion of a military motorcycle rider training course that meets or exceeds the
Motorcycle Safety Foundation curriculum standards by an applicant who is an active member
of the United States Armed Forces, shall constitute an actual demonstration of the person's
ability to exercise due care in the operation of a motorcycle or motortricycle, and no further
practical knowledge or driving test shall be required to obtain a motorcycle or motortricycle
license or endorsement. The military motorcycle rider training course completion shall be
accepted for purposes of motorcycle license or endorsement issuance for one year from the
date of course completion. The director of revenue is authorized to promulgate rules and
regulations for the administration and implementation of this subsection including rules
governing the presentment of motorcycle training course completion cards from a military
motorcycle rider training course or other documentation showing that the applicant has
successfully completed a course in basic motorcycle safety instruction that meets or exceeds
curriculum standards established by the Motorcycle Safety Foundation or other national
organization whose purpose is to improve the safety of motorcyclists on the nation's streets
and highways. Any rule or portion of a rule, as that term is defined in section 536.010, that is
created under the authority delegated in this section shall become effective only if it complies
with and is subject to all of the provisions of chapter 536 and, if applicable, section 536.028.
This section and chapter 536 are nonseverable and if any of the powers vested with the
general assembly pursuant to chapter 536 to review, to delay the effective date, or to
disapprove and annul a rule are subsequently held unconstitutional, then the grant of

HB 3522 4
rulemaking authority and any rule proposed or adopted after August 28, 2012, shall be invalid
and void.
✔